Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 24, O.S.L. 2022
(70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 3231), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3231. A. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Oklahoma National Guard Educational Assistance Act".
B. As used in this act:
1. "Oklahoma educational institution" means an institution of
higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education;
2. "Eligible Guard member" means a current member of the
Oklahoma National Guard in good standing who has a high school
diploma or who has completed General Educational Development (GED)

requirements and who has secured admission to and enrolled in an
Oklahoma educational institution;
3. "Graduate program" means a program offered by an Oklahoma
educational institution that leads to the award of a master's
degree;
4. "Program" means the Oklahoma National Guard Educational
Assistance Program established pursuant to the provisions of this
section; and
5. "Undergraduate program" means a program offered by an
Oklahoma educational institution that leads to the award of an
associate's degree or a baccalaureate degree.
C. There is hereby created the Oklahoma National Guard
Educational Assistance Program to provide assistance to eligible
Guard members who enroll in an Oklahoma educational institution.
Subject to the availability of funds, the amount of assistance shall
be equivalent to the amount of resident tuition, and approved
mandatory fees, and program fees, academic service fees, and any
other fees for courses in which the eligible Guard member is
enrolled, not to exceed a maximum of eighteen (18) credit hours each
semester. The amount of mandatory fees, program fees, academic
service fees, and any other fees shall be jointly reviewed and
approved by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the
Military Department of the State of Oklahoma before a determination
to pay the fees is made.
1. The amount of assistance provided to an eligible Guard
member enrolled in an undergraduate program shall not exceed a
maximum of one hundred twenty (120) credit hours in pursuit of an
associate's degree and/or a baccalaureate degree.
2. Subject to the assistance for eligible Guard members
enrolled in undergraduate programs being fully funded, assistance
shall be provided to an eligible Guard member with a baccalaureate
degree enrolled in a graduate program. The amount of assistance
provided to an eligible Guard member enrolled in a graduate program
shall not exceed a maximum of forty (40) credit hours in pursuit of
a master's degree.
3. Assistance provided pursuant to this section shall be
granted without any limitation other than the amount of funds
available for the Program and the number of eligible Guard members
ENR. H. B. NO. 2257 Page 2

who apply, subject to any cap established by the Military
Department.
4. Assistance allowed by this section shall not be allowed for
courses taken in excess of the requirements for completion of an
undergraduate program or a graduate program, whichever is applicable
for the eligible Guard member.
D. Assistance provided pursuant to this section shall be
allocated to the Oklahoma educational institution from the Oklahoma
National Guard Educational Assistance Revolving Fund created
pursuant to Section 2 3232 of this act title.
E. To be eligible to apply for the Program, an eligible Guard
member shall:
1. Have at least one (1) year remaining on his or her
enlistment contract at the beginning of any semester for which the
member applies for assistance pursuant to this section;
2. Agree in writing to complete his or her current service
obligation in the Oklahoma National Guard; and
3. Agree in writing to serve actively in good standing with the
Oklahoma National Guard for not less than twenty-four (24) months
after completion of the last semester for which the member receives
assistance pursuant to this section.
F. To retain eligibility for the Program, an eligible Guard
member shall:
1. Maintain good academic standing and satisfactory academic
progress according to standards of the Oklahoma educational
institution in which the member is enrolled;
2. Maintain the requirements for retention and degree
completion as established by the Oklahoma educational institution in
which the member is enrolled;
3. Maintain a minimum grade point average of 2.0 on a 4.0
scale; and
4. Maintain satisfactory participation in the Oklahoma National
Guard; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 2257 Page 3

5. Possess a Military Occupational Specialty (MOS) or Air Force
Specialty Code (AFSC) after his or her first semester.
G. An eligible Guard member seeking assistance pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall submit an application on a form
prescribed by the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma to
the Educational Service Office of the Military Department prior to
the semester for which assistance is sought. The Military
Department may establish a cap on the number of eligible Guard
members allowed to participate per semester per undergraduate or
graduate program. The eligible Guard member's Commander or his or
her designee shall confirm a member's standing and eligibility to
the Oklahoma educational institution in which the student is
enrolled.
H. The eligible Guard member's Commander may deny an
application submitted by an eligible Guard member for continued
Program assistance if he or she fails to comply with the provisions
of paragraph 1, 2, or 3, 4, or 5 of subsection F of this section.
I. An eligible Guard member who has received Program assistance
pursuant to the provisions of this section and who fails to comply
with the provisions of paragraph 4 of subsection F of this section
shall be required to repay an amount to be calculated as follows:
1. Determine the total amount of assistance provided pursuant
to the provisions of this section;
2. Divide the amount determined in paragraph 1 of this
subsection by twenty-four (24); and
3. Multiply the amount determined in paragraph 2 of this
subsection by the number of months the member did not fulfill the
requirements of paragraph 4 of subsection F of this section.
Repayments shall be deposited into the Oklahoma National Guard
Educational Assistance Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2
3232 of this act title.
J. An eligible Guard member who has received Program assistance
pursuant to the provisions of this section and who fails to comply
with the provisions of paragraph 4 of subsection F of this section
due to hardship circumstances may request a waiver from repayment.
A waiver request shall be submitted in writing to the Adjutant
General.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2257 Page 4

K. By July 1 annually, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall notify the Adjutant General of the amount of funding
available in the Oklahoma National Guard Educational Assistance
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2 3232 of this act title.
L. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this act including
deadlines for submission of applications required by subsection G of
this section. The Military Department of the State of Oklahoma
shall promulgate regulations pertaining to the application process
and the determination of eligibility for the assistance program.
The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and Military
Department shall coordinate the promulgation of rules and
regulations to ensure compatibility. The Adjutant General may
promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2257 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2257 Page 6